src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L               
SFX L                   
SFX L              
SFX L                  
SFX L              
SFX L                  
SFX L                 
SFX L                     
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX L                   
SFX L                       
SFX N Y 281
SFX N 0       
SFX N 0       
SFX N            
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N         [^   ]   
SFX N           [^   ]     
SFX N        [     ]   
SFX N          [     ]     
SFX N        [     ]   
SFX N          [     ]     
SFX N               
SFX N                   
SFX N               
SFX N                   
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N               
SFX N                   
SFX N               
SFX N                   
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N             [^ ]     
SFX N               [^ ]       
SFX N             [^ ]     
SFX N               [^ ]       
SFX N              [^ ]     
SFX N                [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N             [^ ]     
SFX N               [^ ]       
SFX N             [^ ]     
SFX N               [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N               [^ ]     
SFX N                 [^ ]       
SFX N         [  ]   
SFX N           [  ]     
SFX N         [  ]   
SFX N           [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N          [  ]   
SFX N            [  ]     
SFX N         [  ]   
SFX N           [  ]     
SFX N         [  ]   
SFX N           [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N           [  ]   
SFX N             [  ]     
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                  
SFX N                      
SFX N                    
SFX N                        
SFX N                    
SFX N                        
SFX N                     
SFX N                         
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                    
SFX N                        
SFX N                    
SFX N                        
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N                      
SFX N                          
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N          [  ]    
SFX N            [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N           [  ]    
SFX N             [  ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N          [   ]    
SFX N            [   ]      
SFX N          [   ]    
SFX N            [   ]      
SFX N           [   ]    
SFX N             [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N         [^ ]    
SFX N           [^ ]      
SFX N         [^ ]    
SFX N           [^ ]      
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N          [   ]    
SFX N            [   ]      
SFX N          [   ]    
SFX N            [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N            [   ]    
SFX N              [   ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N        [  ]    
SFX N          [  ]      
SFX N        [  ]    
SFX N          [  ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N          [  ]    
SFX N            [  ]      
SFX N          [  ]    
SFX N            [  ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N         [  ]    
SFX N           [  ]      
SFX N                 
SFX N                     
SFX N              
SFX N                  
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
SFX N                
SFX N                    
PFX Z Y 1
PFX Z 0    . 
PFX Y Y 1
PFX Y 0     . 
PFX X Y 1
PFX X       
